Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1925.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 22 O.S. 2021, Section 60.6, as


amended by Section 474, Chapter 486, O.S.L. 2025 (22 O.S. Supp.


2025, Section 60.6), is amended to read as follows:


Section 60.6. A. Except as otherwise provided by this section,


any person who:


1. Has been served with an emergency temporary, ex parte, or


final protective order or foreign protective order and is in


violation of such the protective order, upon conviction, shall be

Req. No. 2404 Page 1


guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine of not more


than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), or by a term of imprisonment


in the county jail of not for not less than six (6) months nor more


than one (1) year, or by both such fine and imprisonment; and


2. After a previous conviction of a violation of a protective


order, is convicted of a second or subsequent offense pursuant to


the provisions of this section shall, upon conviction, be guilty of


a Class D1 felony offense and shall be punished by a term of


imprisonment as provided for in subsections B through F E of Section


20N of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes, or by a fine of not less


than Two Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00) nor more than Ten Thousand


Dollars ($10,000.00), or by both such fine and imprisonment and


fine.


B. 1. Any person who has been served with an emergency


temporary, ex parte, or final protective order or foreign protective


order who violates the protective order and causes physical injury


or physical impairment to the plaintiff or to any other person named


in said the protective order shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a


misdemeanor Class D1 felony and shall be punished by a term of


imprisonment in the county jail custody of the Department of


Corrections for not less than twenty (20) days nor more than one (1)


year three (3) years. In addition to the term of imprisonment, the


person may be punished by a fine not to exceed Five Thousand Dollars


($5,000.00).

Req. No. 2404 Page 2


2. Any person who is convicted of a second or subsequent


violation of a protective order which causes physical injury or


physical impairment to a plaintiff or to any other person named in


the protective order shall be guilty of a Class D1 felony offense


and shall be punished by a term of imprisonment in the custody of


the Department of Corrections of for not less than one (1) year nor


more than five (5) years, or by a fine of not less than Three


Thousand Dollars ($3,000.00) nor more than Ten Thousand Dollars


($10,000.00), or by both such fine and imprisonment and fine.


3. In determining the term of imprisonment required by this


section, the jury or sentencing judge shall consider the degree of


physical injury or physical impairment to the victim.


4. The provisions of this subsection shall not affect the


applicability of Sections 644, 645, 647, and 652 of Title 21 of the


Oklahoma Statutes.


C. The minimum sentence of imprisonment issued pursuant to the


provisions of paragraph 2 of subsection A and paragraph 2 of


subsection B of this section shall not be subject to statutory


provisions for suspended sentences, deferred sentences, or


probation,; provided, the court may subject any remaining penalty


under the jurisdiction of the court to the statutory provisions for


suspended sentences, deferred sentences, or probation.


D. In addition to any other penalty specified by this section,


the court shall require a defendant to undergo the treatment or

Req. No. 2404 Page 3


participate in the counseling services necessary to bring about the


cessation of domestic abuse against the victim or to bring about the


cessation of stalking or harassment of the victim. For every


conviction of violation of a protective order:


1. The court shall specifically order as a condition of a


suspended sentence or probation that a defendant participate in


counseling or undergo treatment to bring about the cessation of


domestic abuse as specified in paragraph 2 of this subsection;


2. a. The court shall require the defendant to participate


in counseling or undergo treatment for domestic abuse


by an individual licensed practitioner or a domestic


abuse treatment program certified by the Attorney


General. If the defendant is ordered to participate


in a domestic abuse counseling or treatment program,


the order shall require the defendant to attend the


program for a minimum of fifty-two (52) weeks,


complete the program, and be evaluated before and


after attendance of the program by a program counselor


or a private counselor.


b. A program for anger management, couples counseling, or


family and marital counseling shall not solely qualify


for the counseling or treatment requirement for


domestic abuse pursuant to this subsection. The These


forms of counseling may be ordered in addition to

Req. No. 2404 Page 4


counseling specifically for the treatment of domestic


abuse or per evaluation as set forth below. If, after


sufficient evaluation and attendance at required


counseling sessions, the domestic violence treatment


program or licensed professional determines that the


defendant does not evaluate as a perpetrator of


domestic violence or does evaluate as a perpetrator of


domestic violence and should complete other programs


of treatment simultaneously or prior to domestic


violence treatment, including, but not limited to,


programs related to the mental health, apparent


substance or alcohol abuse, or inability or refusal to


manage anger, the defendant shall be ordered to


complete the counseling as per the recommendations of


the domestic violence treatment program or licensed


professional;


3. a. The court shall set a review hearing no more than one


hundred twenty (120) days after the defendant is


ordered to participate in a domestic abuse counseling


program or undergo treatment for domestic abuse to


assure the attendance and compliance of the defendant


with the provisions of this subsection and the


domestic abuse counseling or treatment requirements.



Req. No. 2404 Page 5


b. The court shall set a second review hearing after the


completion of the counseling or treatment to assure


the attendance and compliance of the defendant with


the provisions of this subsection and the domestic


abuse counseling or treatment requirements. The court


may suspend sentencing of the defendant until the


defendant has presented proof to the court of


enrollment in a program of treatment for domestic


abuse by an individual licensed practitioner or a


domestic abuse treatment program certified by the


Attorney General and attendance at weekly sessions of


such program. Such proof shall be presented to the


court by the defendant no later than one hundred


twenty (120) days after the defendant is ordered to


such counseling or treatment. At such time, the court


may complete sentencing, beginning the period of the


sentence from the date that proof of enrollment is


presented to the court, and schedule reviews as


required by subparagraphs subparagraph a and b of this


paragraph, this subparagraph, and paragraphs 4 and 5


of this subsection. The court shall retain continuing


jurisdiction over the defendant during the course of


ordered counseling through the final review hearing;



Req. No. 2404 Page 6


4. The court may set subsequent or other review hearings as the


court determines necessary to assure the defendant attends and fully


complies with the provisions of this subsection and the domestic


abuse counseling or treatment requirements;


5. At any review hearing, if the defendant is not


satisfactorily attending individual counseling or a domestic abuse


counseling or treatment program or is not in compliance with any


domestic abuse counseling or treatment requirements, the court may


order the defendant to further or continue counseling, treatment, or


other necessary services. The court may revoke all or any part of a


suspended sentence, deferred sentence, or probation pursuant to


Section 991b of this title and subject the defendant to any or all


remaining portions of the original sentence;


6. At the first review hearing, the court shall require the


defendant to appear in court. Thereafter, for any subsequent review


hearings, the court may accept a report on the progress of the


defendant from individual counseling, domestic abuse counseling, or


the treatment program. There shall be no requirement for the victim


to attend review hearings; and


7. If funding is available, a referee may be appointed and


assigned by the presiding judge of the district court to hear


designated cases set for review under this subsection. Reasonable


compensation for the referees shall be fixed by the presiding judge.


The referee shall meet the requirements and perform all duties in

Req. No. 2404 Page 7


the same manner and procedure as set forth in Sections 1-8-103 and


2-2-702 of Title 10A of the Oklahoma Statutes pertaining to referees


appointed in juvenile proceedings.


E. Emergency temporary, ex parte, and final protective orders


shall include notice of these penalties.


F. When a minor child violates the provisions of any protective


order, the violation shall be heard in a juvenile proceeding and the


court may order the child and the parent or parents of the child to


participate in family counseling services necessary to bring about


the cessation of domestic abuse against the victim and may order


community service hours to be performed in lieu of any fine or


imprisonment authorized by this section.


G. Any district court of this state and any judge thereof shall


be immune from any liability or prosecution for issuing an order


that requires a defendant to:


1. Attend a treatment program for domestic abusers certified by


the Attorney General;


2. Attend counseling or treatment services ordered as part of


any final protective order or for any violation of a protective


order; and


3. Attend, complete, and be evaluated before and after


attendance by a treatment program for domestic abusers certified by


the Attorney General.



Req. No. 2404 Page 8


H. At no time, under any proceeding, may a person protected by


a protective order be held to be in violation of that protective


order. Only a defendant against whom a protective order has been


issued may be held to have violated the order.


I. In addition to any other penalty specified by this section,


the court may order a defendant to use an active, real-time, twenty-


four-hour Global Positioning System (GPS) monitoring device as a


condition of a sentence. The court may further order the defendant


to pay costs and expenses related to the GPS device and monitoring.


J. Any pleas of guilty or nolo contendere or finding of guilt


to a violation of any provision of this section shall constitute a


conviction of the offense for the purpose of any subsection of this


section under which the existence of a prior conviction is relevant


for a period of ten (10) years following the completion of any


sentence or court imposed probationary term.


SECTION 2. REPEALER 22 O.S. 2021, Section 60.6, as


amended by Section 2, Chapter 145, O.S.L. 2025 (22 O.S. Supp. 2025,


Section 60.6), is hereby repealed.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-2404 CN 1/15/2026 8:50:54 AM







Req. No. 2404 Page 9